Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1284.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2304-A(e)(9)(vi) of the act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921, is amended to read:Section 2304-A. Contracts and coverage packages.* * *(e) Duties of contractor.--A contractor with whom the department enters into a contract shall do the following:1234567891011121314151617181920212223 * * *(9) Subject to any necessary Federal approval, provide the following minimum coverage package, which may not conflict with Federal law, regulation or guidance, for eligible children:* * *(vi) Emergency, preventive and routine dental care. This subparagraph includes frenectomies and other surgical procedures to treat lip-ties or tongue-ties. This subparagraph does not include orthodontia or cosmetic surgery.* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 2304.1-A. Frenectomy services required.A dental provider who contracts with an insurer awarded a contract under section 2304-A to provide health care under this article shall offer frenectomies or other surgical procedures to treat a lip-tie or tongue-tie as a covered routine dental service.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1284PN1455 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920